Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2316
Escape; recapture or destroy animal.

(1) Any permitholder under the Domesticated Cervine Animal Act shall, within twenty-four hours after the discovery of the escape of any such animals, notify the department, which shall immediately notify the commission, of such escape.

(2) It is the responsibility of the permitholder to recapture or destroy any escaped domesticated cervine animal within five days.

(3) If the permitholder is unwilling or unable to capture any escaped domesticated cervine animal within five days after the discovery of such escape, the commission may destroy such escaped animals. The commission may, on a case-by-case basis, extend the number of days for a permitholder to recapture or destroy any escaped domesticated cervine animal.

(4) Any escaped domesticated cervine animal known to have originated from an area placed under quarantine by the department pursuant to section 54-2314 may be destroyed by the commission upon notice of the escape of such animal.

(5) Any expenses incurred by the department or the commission to recapture or destroy escaped domesticated cervine animals shall be assessed to the permitholder. The department and the commission shall not be held liable for the value of any domesticated cervine animal destroyed under this section.

Laws 1999, LB 404, § 15.